test/src/gt-desc-yamls/transitive_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - transitive verb - ok : # Test for intransitive verb inflection
    #Present Tense
    #Obj. = 1st person singular consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg2: nikinaasik' # me buscas
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg3: nikinixsik' # me busca él TODO what is going on here?
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl2: nikineesik' # me buscan ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl3: nikine'xsik' # me buscan ellos

    #Obj. = 1st person singular vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg2: nikinaawab'i # me escuchas
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Sg3: nikinrab'i # me escucha él
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl2: nikineerab'i # me escuchan ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg1+SetA.Pl3: nikine'rab'i # me escuchan ellos

    #Obj. = 1st person plural consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg2: nokohaasik' # nos buscas
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg3: nokoxsik' # nos busca él
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl2: nokoheesik' # nos buscan ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl3: nokohe'xsik' # nos buscan ellos

    #Obj. = 1st person plural vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg2: nokohaawab'i # nos escuchas
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Sg3: nokorab'i # nos escucha él
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl2: nokoheerab'i # nos escuchan ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl1+SetA.Pl3: nokohe'rab'i # nos escuchan ellos

    #Obj. = 2nd person singular consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg1: nakatinsik' # te busco
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg3: nakatxsik' # te busca él
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl1: nakatqasik' # te buscamos
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl3: nakate'xsik' # te buscan ellos

    #Obj. = 2nd person singular vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg1: nakatwab'i # te escucho
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Sg3: nakatrab'i # él te escucha
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl1: nakatqab'i # te escuchamos
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg2+SetA.Pl3: nakate'rab'i # ellos te escuchan

    #Obj = 2nd person plural consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg1: nekexinsik' # les busco a ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg3: nekexxsik' # él les busca a ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl1: nekexqasik' # les buscamos a ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl3: nekexxsik'eb' # ellos les buscan a ustedes

    #Obj = 2nd person plural vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg1: nekexwab'i # les escucho a ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Sg3: nekexrab'i # él les escucha a ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl1: nekexqab'i # les escuchamos a ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Pl2+SetA.Pl3: nekexrab'iheb' # ellos les escuchan a ustedes

    #Obj = 3rd person singular consonant initial
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg1: ninsik' # lo busco
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg2: nakasik' # lo buscas
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg3: naxsik' # lo busca él
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl1: naqasik' # lo buscamos
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl2: nekesik' # lo buscan ustedes
    sik'+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl3: neke'xsik' # lo buscan ellos

    #Obj = 3rd persion singular vowel initial
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg1: nawab'i # lo escucho
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg2: nakawab'i # lo escuchas
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Sg3: narab'i # lo escucha él
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl1: naqab'i # lo escuchamos
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl2: nekerab'i # lo escuchan ustedes
    ab'i+V+TV+SetB.Sg3+SetA.Pl3: neke'rab'i # lo escuchan ellos
